Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.065

Audit of entities with state contracts or grants—Report regarding criminal misuse of public moneys.

If after a financial audit of an entity that receives public moneys under contract or grant in return for services, there is reasonable cause to believe that a criminal misuse of public moneys has occurred, the office of the state auditor, within thirty days from receipt of the report, shall deliver a copy of the report to the appropriate local prosecuting authority.

[ 1998 c 232 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1998 c 232: See note following RCW 43.09.055.